Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-18] Relation to
Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. This
chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global
and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001 et seq., but does not modify,
limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that Act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001(c), or
authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b)
of that Act, 15 U.S.C. section 7003(b). [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next